Utah statutes.
76-8-307.   Failure to aid peace officer.
A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if, upon command by a peace
officer identifiable or identified by him as such, he unreasonably fails or
refuses to aid the peace officer in effecting an arrest or in preventing the
commission of any offense by another person.
